Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. Human Services Community Match Program.

Sec. 29.60.600.
Human services community matching grants.

Within the limits of appropriations for the purpose, the Department of Health and Social Services shall, upon application, make a matching grant to a qualified municipality equal to 70 percent of the estimated reasonable costs of providing essential human services through private nonprofit agencies within the municipality, including services to persons who travel to the municipality from their residences elsewhere in the state.

To qualify for a grant under this section, a municipality is required to

provide from other sources 30 percent of the estimated reasonable costs of providing the services to be funded by the grant; other sources may include federal or municipal money or money from other private or public sources; in this paragraph, “municipal money” includes money derived from appropriations, allocations, entitlements, grants, or other payments from the state other than the state grant under this section but does not include locally contributed staff hours, material, equipment, or other in-kind contributions;

comply with the grant application procedure and contractual agreements under AS

29.60.610

; and

establish and consult with a citizens’ advisory group, the majority of whose membership consists of persons who do not hold elected municipal office, concerning priorities and allocations among services funded under this section.

A city may not receive a human services matching grant during a fiscal year to provide a specific service if, during that same year, the borough within which it is located has received a grant for the same service. A borough may not receive a grant during a fiscal year to provide a particular service if, during that same year, a city within the borough has received a grant for the same service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 42 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Sec. 29.60.610.
Grant procedure; contract.

If a qualified municipality wishes to apply for a grant under AS

29.60.600

, the municipality shall apply for a grant for a fiscal year by submitting a form prescribed by the commissioner of health and social services before October 1 of the preceding fiscal year. The application must generally describe the services that are proposed to be funded with the grant and include the following information:

a statement that each proposed service will meet the goals established under AS

47.75.010

and an explanation of why the service is necessary to prevent or alleviate serious mental or physical hardship; this explanation must be supported by a needs assessment carried out by the municipality;

a description of the categories of individuals to whom the services are to be provided; and

an estimate of the expenditures required for each of the services to be provided.

A human services community matching grant shall be allotted in accordance with an agreement made between the grantee and the commissioner of health and social services on behalf of the state. The agreement may include any provision agreed upon by the parties and must include the following provisions:

a statement by the grantee that the match requirement of AS

29.60.600

has been met by the grantee;

estimates of reasonable costs of funding the services; and

a requirement that no more than five percent of the grant money received under AS

29.60.600

may be used for municipal administrative costs connected with distributing the grant money to the private nonprofit agencies providing the services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.60.620.
Allocation of money.

If the amount of money appropriated by the legislature for human services community matching grants under AS

29.60.600

is not adequate to satisfy amounts required for the qualified municipalities who have applied for grants, the money shall be allocated proportionately among the qualified municipalities for which a grant has been approved under AS

29.60.600

—

29.60.650

based on the relationship the population of each municipality bears to the total population of the qualified municipalities for which a grant has been approved under AS 29.60.600 —

29.60.650

.

For purposes of (a) of this section, population shall be determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development based on the latest figures of the United States Bureau of the Census or other reliable population data. If a city within a borough has an approved grant for a service to be provided on an areawide basis, the allocation under (a) of this section shall be based on the population of the borough.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(8), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 29.60.650.
Definitions.

In AS

29.60.600

—

29.60.650

,

“essential human services” and “services” have the meaning given “social services” in AS

47.75.060

except that they include only services whose unavailability would subject persons needing the services to serious mental or physical hardship;

“municipality” means a (A) city whose population is over 20,000; (B) unified municipality whose population is over 100,000; or (C) second class borough whose population is over 65,000; population for purposes of this paragraph shall be determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(8), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.